Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.110

Acceptance of fees—Compliance with chapter.

An agency may not charge or accept a fee or other consideration from a client, care services provider, or supportive housing provider unless the agency substantially complies with the terms of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 357 s 12.]